Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20132-1080.01
Harmonization plan, defined.

Harmonization
plan shall mean any agreement between states, or a state or states and the
federal government, designed to limit the spread of a plant pest into or out
of a designated area.

Laws 2013, LB68, § 5.